Colorado, session 2026A, HB1257.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 30-15-401.4, amend
(1)(a)(I), (1)(a)(II), (1)(a)(III), (1)(a)(IV) introductory portion,
(1)(a)(IV)(A), (1)(b)(I), (2)(d), (3)(a), (3.5)(c), (4)(a) introductory portion,
(4)(a)(II), (4)(a)(IV) introductory portion, (4)(a)(XI.5) introductory portion,
(4)(a)(XI.5)(C), (4)(a)(XII) introductory portion, (4)(a)(XII)(D), (4.5)(a)
introductory portion, (4.5)(a)(I), (5) introductory portion, (6), (7)
introductory portion, (7)(g)(II), and (7)(h)(III); and add (1)(a)(I.5),
(1)(a)(II.5), (1)(a)(III.5), (1)(a)(IX), (1)(a)(X), (3)(d), (4)(a)(XIII), and (7)(i)
as follows:
30-15-401.4. Statewide policy to prevent the operation of illicit
massage businesses - local regulation authorized - background checks
required - legislative declaration - definitions.
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

(1) (a) The general assembly finds and declares that:
(I) Illicit massage businesses present a facade of legitimate services,
concealing that the primary business is the sex and labor trafficking of
victims who are trapped in these businesses. THE REPUTATION AND SUCCESS
OF LEGITIMATE MASSAGE THERAPY BUSINESSES IS DENIGRATED AND
UNDERMINED BY INDIVIDUALS WHO CONCEAL UNLAWFUL ACTIVITIES, SUCH
AS HUMAN TRAFFICKING, BY FALSELY POSING AS MASSAGE THERAPY
BUSINESSES.
(I.5) THE OPERATION OF ILLICIT MASSAGE THERAPY BUSINESSES IS
DANGEROUS TO THE PUBLIC AND CAN RESULT IN UNLAWFUL SEXUAL
ACTIVITIES, HUMAN TRAFFICKING, ILLEGAL BUILDING IMPROVEMENTS,
ZONING VIOLATIONS, AND NUISANCE ACTIVITIES;
(II) Human trafficking is a growing problem throughout Colorado.
FROM 1977 UNTIL 2015, THE COLORADO MASSAGE PARLOR CODE
AUTHORIZED LOCAL GOVERNMENTS TO REGULATE MASSAGE PARLORS
THROUGH LICENSURE PROGRAMS. IN 2014, A SUNSET REVIEW RECOMMENDED
SUNSETTING THE MASSAGE PARLOR CODE BASED ON A VIEW THAT THE CODE
WAS NOT "A SIGNIFICANT FACTOR IN THE FIGHT AGAINST PROSTITUTION" AND
WAS NOT NECESSARY TO PROTECT THE PUBLIC HEALTH, SAFETY, AND
WELFARE. THE COLORADO MASSAGE PARLOR CODE WAS REPEALED IN 2015
BY SENATE BILL 15-122, DISMANTLING DOZENS OF LOCAL LICENSING
SYSTEMS THAT LOCAL GOVERNMENTS HAD ENACTED TO ADDRESS HUMAN
TRAFFICKING.
(II.5) THE "MASSAGE THERAPY PRACTICE ACT", ARTICLE 235 OF
TITLE 12, WAS ENACTED IN 2008 TO REGULATE THE PROFESSION OF MASSAGE
THERAPY AND TO PROVIDE FOR CONSISTENT STATEWIDE CERTIFICATION AND
OVERSIGHT OF MASSAGE THERAPISTS. THE "MASSAGE THERAPY PRACTICE
ACT" PERMITS LOCAL GOVERNMENTS TO INSPECT MASSAGE THERAPY
LICENSES AND BUSINESS PREMISES WHERE MASSAGE THERAPY IS CONDUCTED
TO ENSURE COMPLIANCE WITH APPLICABLE LAWS.
(III) All local governments in the state already have authority to
enact resolutions or ordinances to establish licensing authorities to regulate
or otherwise regulate massage facilities and to deter and shut down illicit
massage facilities WHERE THE FACILITIES EXIST OR ARE REASONABLY LIKELY
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1257

TO OCCUR; and
(III.5) IN 2018, THROUGH ITS AUTHORITY AS A HOME RULE
MUNICIPALITY, THE CITY OF AURORA ENACTED AN ORDINANCE TO REGULATE
MASSAGE FACILITIES TO COMBAT HUMAN TRAFFICKING BY FOCUSING
DIRECTLY ON THE PERPETRATORS OF TRAFFICKING AND THE DETERRENCE OF
UNLAWFUL BEHAVIOR AS AN ALTERNATIVE TO TRADITIONAL LAW
ENFORCEMENT APPROACHES. OTHER MUNICIPALITIES FOLLOWED SUIT AND
THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY SUBSEQUENTLY ENACTED HOUSE BILL 22-1300 IN
2022 TO AUTHORIZE COUNTIES TO ENACT SIMILAR REGULATIONS.
(IV) Because preventing the operation of illicit massage facilities by
requiring current and prospective operators, owners, and employees of
massage facilities to submit to periodic background checks is a matter of
statewide concern and licensing and other regulation of massage facilities
is a matter of mixed statewide and local concern, that AND BECAUSE local
governments have significant discretion to address ADOPT ORDINANCES AND
RESOLUTIONS in accordance with local needs, it is necessary, appropriate,
and in the best interest of all Coloradans to:
(A) Require uniformly throughout the state as a matter of statewide
policy, that every current and prospective operator, owner, and employee of
a massage facility submit to a background check, which generally means a
fingerprint-based criminal history record check, as required by this section;
and
(IX) LOCAL REGULATION OF MASSAGE FACILITIES HAS BEEN
EFFECTIVE IN REDUCING THE NUMBER OF ILLICIT MASSAGE BUSINESSES,
DETERRING THE LOCATION OF NEW ILLICIT MASSAGE BUSINESSES, AND
FOCUSING ON THE BEHAVIOR OF PERPETRATORS OF HUMAN TRAFFICKING;
AND
(X) THE LOCAL REGULATION OF MASSAGE FACILITIES, IMPLEMENTED
CONSISTENTLY WITH THE "MASSAGE THERAPY PRACTICE ACT", RECOGNIZES
THAT MASSAGE THERAPY IS A LEGITIMATE HEALTH-CARE PROFESSION THAT
PROVIDES BENEFITS TO THE RESIDENTS OF COLORADO.
(b) The general assembly further finds and declares that:
(I) A local government may adopt a resolution or ordinance to
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1257

establish business licensure requirements to regulate massage facilities or
to regulate and prohibit unlawful activities AT MASSAGE FACILITIES for the
sole purpose of deterring illicit massage businesses, and preventing human
trafficking, PROTECTING LEGITIMATE MASSAGE THERAPY BUSINESSES, AND
SAFEGUARDING AND PROMOTING PUBLIC HEALTH, SAFETY, AND WELFARE;
(2) As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:
(d) "Illicit massage business" means a business that may provide
PROVIDES massage but AND:
(I) Engages in human-trafficking-related offenses, as described in
sections SECTION 18-3-503 and OR 18-3-504; OR
(II) COMMITS OTHER OFFENSES AS DEFINED BY STATE LAW OR LOCAL
ORDINANCE.
(3) (a) In addition to any other powers, a local government may
adopt a resolution or ordinance to establish business licensure requirements
or to regulate and prohibit unlawful activities to prevent the operation of
illicit massage businesses that engage in human trafficking-related offenses
as described in sections 18-3-503 and 18-3-504 If a local government
adopts a resolution or ordinance to establish business licensure requirements
pursuant to subsection (4) of this section or to prohibit unlawful activities
pursuant to subsection (5) of this section, the resolution or ordinance must
not be more restrictive than the requirements set forth in this section OR
COMMIT OTHER OFFENSES AS DEFINED BY STATE LAW OR LOCAL ORDINANCE.
(d) ON AND AFTER AUGUST 13, 2026, WHEN ADOPTING A
RESOLUTION OR ORDINANCE PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION, A LOCAL
GOVERNMENT SHALL CONSIDER THE IMPACTS OF THE RESOLUTION OR
ORDINANCE ON LEGITIMATE MASSAGE THERAPY BUSINESSES AND CONDUCT
OUTREACH TO MASSAGE THERAPISTS AND MASSAGE THERAPY BUSINESSES
IN THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT'S JURISDICTION AND STATEWIDE
ORGANIZATIONS OF MASSAGE THERAPISTS.
(3.5) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3)(c) of this
section, a local government shall establish a process in accordance with 34
U.S.C. sec. 41101, which must be established by ordinance or resolution,
in accordance with 34 U.S.C. sec. 41101; must meet the criteria established
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1257

by the federal bureau of investigation in implementing 34 U.S.C. sec.
41101; and must be performed in accordance with section 24-33.5-424.5,
to require that, as a condition for a person remaining as or becoming an
operator, owner, or employee:
(c) A prospective operator or owner submit to a background check
performed in accordance with section 24-33.5-424.5 at least thirty days
before, as applicable, being granted a license to operate a massage facility
or assuming an ownership interest in a massage facility that would make the
prospective owner an owner.
(4) (a) If a local government adopts a resolution or ordinance to
establish business licensure requirements for massage facilities as set forth
in subsection (3)(a) of this section, the business licensure requirements may
only include:
(II) Requiring a reasonable administrative fee not to exceed one
hundred fifty dollars for issuing or renewing licensure applications. The fee
must not be based on the number of employees. This subsection (4)(a)(II)
applies only to new businesses applying for a license or renewal on or after
August 10, 2022. Businesses that hold a license before August 10, 2022, are
exempt from the administrative fees described in this subsection (4)(a)(II)
THE ADMINISTRATIVE FEE ADOPTED BY THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT MUST BE
REASONABLY RELATED TO THE COSTS OF THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT IN
ADMINISTERING THE RESOLUTION OR ORDINANCE AND THE LICENSING OF
MASSAGE FACILITIES. A FEE THAT EXCEEDS FIVE HUNDRED DOLLARS IS
PRESUMED TO BE UNREASONABLE UNLESS THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT
ESTABLISHES THAT A FEE GREATER THAN FIVE HUNDRED DOLLARS IS
NECESSARY TO COVER THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT'S COSTS OF ADMINISTERING
THE RESOLUTION OR ORDINANCE AND THE LICENSING OF MASSAGE
FACILITIES. THE FEE MAY BE ADJUSTED FOR INFLATION OR DEFLATION
BEGINNING ON JANUARY 1, 2028, AND ON JANUARY 1 OF EACH YEAR
THEREAFTER. AS USED IN THIS SUBSECTION (4)(a)(II), "INFLATION OR
DEFLATION" MEANS THE ANNUAL PERCENTAGE CHANGE IN THE UNITED
STATES DEPARTMENT OF LABOR'S BUREAU OF LABOR STATISTICS CONSUMER
PRICE INDEX, OR A SUCCESSOR INDEX, FOR DENVER-AURORA-LAKEWOOD
FOR ALL ITEMS PAID FOR BY URBAN CONSUMERS. THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT
MAY ROUND THE ADJUSTED FEE AMOUNT UPWARD OR DOWNWARD TO THE
NEAREST DOLLAR.
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1257

(IV) Allowing a licensing authority, or a THE licensing authority's
designee, to deny an application FOR REASONS DESCRIBED IN THE
ORDINANCE OR RESOLUTION ADOPTED BY THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT,
INCLUDING if:
(XI.5) Granting the A licensing authority, or the licensing authority's
designees, authority to revoke or suspend a license FOR REASONS DESCRIBED
IN THE ORDINANCE OR RESOLUTION ADOPTED BY THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT,
INCLUDING if:
(C) An owner of the licensed massage facility has been convicted
of or entered a plea of nolo contendere that is accepted by the court for an
offense listed in subsection (4)(a)(IV)(C) of this section or is registered as
a sex offender or is required by law to register as a sex offender, as
described in section 16-22-103; and
(XII) Granting a licensing authority, or THE licensing authority's
designees, the authority to revoke or suspend a license for violating
prohibited acts pursuant to subsection (5) of this section. A licensing
authority, or the licensing authority's designees, may temporarily suspend
a license with AND SCHEDULE a hearing to be scheduled within fifteen days
when AFTER the licensing authority MAKES FINDINGS AS DESCRIBED IN THE
ORDINANCE OR RESOLUTION ADOPTED BY THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT OR
finds:
(D) The licensee failed to permit an inspection at a time the massage
facility was open for business; AND
(XIII) ANY OTHER PROVISIONS RELATED TO THE BUSINESS
LICENSURE OR OPERATION OF MASSAGE FACILITIES THAT ARE DEEMED
NECESSARY BY THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT FOR THE PROTECTION OF PUBLIC
HEALTH, SAFETY, AND WELFARE, SO LONG AS THE RESOLUTION OR
ORDINANCE DOES NOT CONFLICT WITH THE REGULATION OF THE PRACTICE OF
MASSAGE THERAPY PURSUANT TO ARTICLE 235 OF TITLE 12.
(4.5) (a) A person is prohibited from being an owner if the person
either IF A LOCAL GOVERNMENT ADOPTS A RESOLUTION OR ORDINANCE TO
ESTABLISH BUSINESS LICENSURE REQUIREMENTS FOR MASSAGE FACILITIES
IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION, THE BUSINESS LICENSURE
REQUIREMENTS MUST PROHIBIT A PERSON FROM OWNING A MASSAGE
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1257

FACILITY IF THE PERSON:
(I) Has not submitted to a required background check at least thirty
days before assuming an ownership interest in a massage facility that would
make the prospective owner an owner pursuant to subsections (4)(c) and
(4)(c.5) of this section; or
(5) A local government may adopt a resolution or ordinance to
prohibit activities to prevent the operation of illicit massage businesses that
engage in human trafficking-related offenses as described in sections
18-3-503 and 18-3-504. Prohibited activities MAY include:
(6) (a) If authorized by the local government COUNTY resolution or
ordinance, a law enforcement officer may follow the penalty assessment
procedure described in section 16-2-201 for any violation of the
prohibitions set forth in subsection (5) of this section. As part of the local
government COUNTY ordinance or resolution authorizing the penalty
assessment procedure, the local government COUNTY may adopt a graduated
fine schedule for violations of the prohibitions set forth in subsection (5) of
this section. A graduated fine schedule may provide for increased penalty
assessments for repeat offenses by the same person.
(b) A local government COUNTY may specify in the resolution or
ordinance that a massage facility that engages in two or more violations of
the resolution or ordinance is a public nuisance, as described in section
16-13-303, unless the violation is already a public nuisance, as described in
section 16-13-303. The county attorney of a county, the city attorney of a
city and county, the city or town attorney of a municipality, or the district
attorney acting pursuant to section 16-13-302 may bring an action in the
district court of the county for an injunction against the massage facility that
violates the resolution or ordinance.
(7) A RESOLUTION OR ORDINANCE ADOPTED BY A LOCAL
GOVERNMENT PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION MUST NOT CONSIDER ANY OF THE
FOLLOWING TO BE A massage facility: does not include:
(g) A place of business where a person offers to perform or
performs massage therapy:
(II) As part of a public or charity event in which the primary purpose
PAGE 7-HOUSE BILL 26-1257

is not to provide massage therapy; and
(h) A place of business where a licensed massage therapist practices
as a solo practitioner and:
(III) Does not maintain or operate a table shower; AND
(i) A HOTEL OR RESORT WITH AT LEAST FIFTY ROOMS, AT WHICH
MASSAGE SERVICES ARE PROVIDED AS AN ANCILLARY AMENITY.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 31-15-401, add (1)(s)
as follows:
31-15-401. General police powers.
(1) In relation to the general police power, the governing bodies of
municipalities have the following powers:
(s) TO LICENSE AND REGULATE THE ESTABLISHMENT AND OPERATION
OF MASSAGE FACILITIES TO PREVENT HUMAN TRAFFICKING AND THE
OPERATION OF ILLICIT MASSAGE FACILITIES IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION
30-15-401.4.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 31-15-407, amend (1)
as follows:
31-15-407. Statewide policy to prevent the operation of illicit
massage businesses - background checks required - legislative
declaration.
(1) The general assembly finds and declares that because preventing
the operation of illicit massage businesses, as defined in section
30-15-401.4, is a matter of statewide concern, and licensing and regulation
of massage facilities is a matter of mixed statewide and local concern, it is
necessary, appropriate, and in the best interest of all Coloradans to require,
uniformly throughout the state as a matter of statewide policy, that every
current and prospective operator, owner, and employee of a massage facility
submit to a background check, as defined in section 30-15-401.4 (2)(a.5),
which generally means a fingerprint-based criminal history record check as
required by section 30-15-401.4.
PAGE 8-HOUSE BILL 26-1257

SECTION 4. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state
constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act within
such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless
PAGE 9-HOUSE BILL 26-1257

approved by the people at the general election to be held in November 2026
and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the official declaration of
the vote thereon by the governor.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 10-HOUSE BILL 26-1257